Wisconsin, session 2025, SB972.
do enact as follows:SB972,11Section 1. 118.015 (1m) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB972,2,72118.015 (1m) (a) (intro.) Beginning in the 2023-24 2025-26 school year and 3annually at least once every 3 school years thereafter, the council on early literacy 4curricula shall recommend to the department early literacy curricula and 5instructional materials for use in the following school year in grades kindergarten 6to 3. The council on early literacy curricula may recommend only early literacy 7curricula and instructional materials that satisfy the following criteria:SB972,28Section 2. 118.015 (1m) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB972,3,89118.015 (1m) (b) 1. By no later than 30 14 days after the department receives 10recommendations under par. (a), the department shall simultaneously submit to 11the joint committee on finance proposed and the appropriate standing committees 12of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) the recommendations received under par. (a) 13and any additional recommendations from the department on early literacy 14curricula and instructional materials that satisfy the criteria under par. (a) 1. and 152. for use in the following school year. In the submission under this subdivision, the 16department shall note which recommendations are made by the council on early 17literacy curricula and which are made by the department. If the cochairpersons of 18the joint committee on finance do not notify the department within 14 working days 19after the date of the submittal of the proposed recommendations that the committee 20has scheduled a meeting to review the proposed recommendations, the department 1shall adopt the proposed recommendations for use in the following school year. If, 2within 14 working days after the date of the submittal of the proposed 3recommendations, the cochairpersons of the committee notify the department that 4the committee has scheduled a meeting to review the proposed recommendations, 5the department may not adopt the proposed recommendations unless the 6committee approves or modifies the proposed recommendations. If the committee 7modifies the plan, the department may adopt the recommendations only as 8modified by the committee.SB972,3,99